California statutes. Insurance Code
The following standards are applicable to all Medicare supplement policies or certificates delivered or issued for delivery in this state with an effective date on or after June 1, 2010. No policy or certificate may be advertised, solicited, delivered, or issued for delivery in this state as a Medicare supplement policy or certificate unless it complies with these benefit plan standards. Benefit plan standards applicable to Medicare supplement policies and certificates issued with an effective date before June 1, 2010, remain subject to the requirements of Section 10192.9.

(a) (1) An issuer shall make available to each prospective policyholder and certificate holder a policy
 form or certificate form containing only the basic (core) benefits, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 10192.81.

(2) If an issuer makes available any of the additional benefits described in subdivision (c) of Section 10192.81, or offers standardized benefit plan K or L, as described in paragraphs (8) and (9) of subdivision (e), then the issuer shall make available to each prospective policyholder and certificate holder, in addition to a policy form or certificate form with only the basic core benefits as described in paragraph (1), a policy form or certificate form containing either standardized benefit plan C, as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (e), or standardized benefit plan F, as described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (e).

(b) No groups, packages, or
 combinations of Medicare supplement benefits other than those listed in this section shall be offered for sale in this state, except as may be permitted in subdivision (f) and by Section 10192.10.

(c) Benefit plans shall be uniform in structure, language, designation, and format to the standard benefit plans listed in subdivision (e) and conform to the definitions in Section 10192.4. Each benefit shall be structured in accordance with the format provided in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 10192.81; or, in the case of plan K or L, in paragraph (8) or (9) of subdivision (e) and list the benefits in the order shown in subdivision (e). For purposes of this section, “structure, language, and format” means style, arrangement, and overall content of a benefit.

(d) In addition to the
 benefit plan designations required in subdivision (c), an issuer may use other designations to the extent permitted by law.

(e) With respect to the makeup of 2010 standardized benefit plans, the following shall apply:

(1) Standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan A shall include only the basic (core) benefits as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 10192.81.

(2) Standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan B shall include only the following: the basic (core) benefit as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 10192.81, plus 100 percent of the Medicare Part A deductible as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 10192.81.

(3) Standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan C shall include only the following: the basic (core) benefit as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 10192.81, plus 100 percent of the Medicare Part A deductible, skilled nursing facility care, 100 percent of the Medicare Part B deductible, and medically necessary emergency care in a foreign country, as defined in paragraphs (1), (3), (4), and (6) of subdivision (c) of Section 10192.81, respectively.

(4) Standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan D shall include only the following: the basic (core) benefit, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 10192.81, plus 100 percent of the Medicare Part A deductible, skilled nursing facility care, and medically necessary emergency care in a foreign country, as defined in paragraphs (1), (3), and (6) of subdivision (c) of Section 10192.81,
 respectively.

(5) Standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan F shall include only the following: the basic (core) benefit as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 10192.81, plus 100 percent of the Medicare Part A deductible, the skilled nursing facility care, 100 percent of the Medicare Part B deductible, 100 percent of the Medicare Part B excess charges, and medically necessary emergency care in a foreign country as defined in paragraphs (1), (3), (4), (5), and (6) of subdivision (c) of Section 10192.81, respectively.

(6) Standardized Medicare supplement benefit high deductible plan F shall include only the following: 100 percent of covered expenses following the payment of the annual deductible set forth in subparagraph (B).

(A) The covered expenses include the basic (core) benefit as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 10192.81, plus 100 percent of the Medicare Part A deductible, skilled nursing facility care, 100 percent of the Medicare Part B deductible, 100 percent of the Medicare Part B excess charges, and medically necessary emergency care in a foreign country, as defined in paragraphs (1), (3), (4), (5), and (6) of subdivision (c) of Section 10192.81, respectively.

(B) The annual deductible in high deductible plan F shall consist of out-of-pocket expenses, other than premiums, for services covered by plan F, and shall be in addition to any other specific benefit deductibles. The basis for the deductible shall be one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) and shall be adjusted annually from 1999 by the Secretary of the United States Department
 of Health and Human Services to reflect the change in the Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers for the 12-month period ending with August of the preceding year, and rounded to the nearest multiple of ten dollars ($10).

(7) (A) Standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan G shall include only the following: the basic (core) benefit as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 10192.81, plus 100 percent of the
 Medicare Part A deductible, skilled nursing facility care, 100 percent of the Medicare Part B excess charges, and medically necessary emergency care in a foreign country, as defined in paragraphs (1), (3), (5), and (6) of subdivision (c) of Section 10192.81, respectively.

(B) Effective January 1, 2020, the standardized benefit plans described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 10192.92 (redesignated high deductible plan G) may be offered to any individual who was eligible for Medicare prior to January 1, 2020.

(8) Standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan K shall include only the following:

(A) Coverage of 100 percent of the Part A hospital coinsurance amount for each day used from the 61st
 through the 90th day in any Medicare benefit period.

(B) Coverage of 100 percent of the Part A hospital coinsurance amount for each Medicare lifetime inpatient reserve day used from the 91st through the 150th day in any Medicare benefit period.

(C) Upon exhaustion of the Medicare hospital inpatient coverage, including the lifetime reserve days, coverage of 100 percent of the Medicare Part A eligible expenses for hospitalization paid at the applicable prospective payment system (PPS) rate, or other appropriate Medicare standard of payment, subject to a lifetime maximum benefit of an additional 365 days. The provider shall accept the issuer’s payment as payment in full and may not bill the insured for any balance.

(D) Coverage for 50 percent of the Medicare Part A inpatient hospital deductible amount per benefit period until the out-of-pocket limitation is met as described in subparagraph (J).

(E) Coverage for 50 percent of the coinsurance amount for each day used from the 21st day through the 100th day in a Medicare benefit period for posthospital skilled nursing facility care eligible under Medicare Part A until the out-of-pocket limitation is met as described in subparagraph (J).

(F) Coverage for 50 percent of cost sharing for all Part A Medicare eligible expenses and respite care until the out-of-pocket limitation is met as described in subparagraph (J).

(G) Coverage for 50 percent, under Medicare Part A or B, of the
 reasonable cost of the first three pints of blood, or equivalent quantities of packed red blood cells, as defined under federal regulations, unless replaced in accordance with federal regulations until the out-of-pocket limitation is met as described in subparagraph (J).

(H) Except for coverage provided in subparagraph (I), coverage for 50 percent of the cost sharing otherwise applicable under Medicare Part B after the policyholder pays the Part B deductible until the out-of-pocket limitation is met as described in subparagraph (J).

(I) Coverage of 100 percent of the cost sharing for Medicare Part B preventive services after the policyholder pays the Part B deductible.

(J) Coverage of 100 percent of all cost sharing under
 Medicare Parts A and B for the balance of the calendar year after the individual has reached the out-of-pocket limitation on annual expenditures under Medicare Parts A and B of four thousand dollars ($4,000) in 2006, indexed each year by the appropriate inflation adjustment specified by the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

(9) Standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan L shall include only the following:

(A) The benefits described in subparagraphs (A), (B), (C), and (I) of paragraph (8).

(B) The benefit described in subparagraphs (D), (E), (F), (G), and (H) of paragraph (8), but substituting 75 percent for 50 percent.

(C) The benefit described in subparagraph (J) of paragraph (8), but substituting two thousand dollars ($2,000) for four thousand dollars ($4,000).

(10) Standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan M shall include only the following: the basic (core) benefit as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 10192.81, plus 50 percent of the Medicare Part A deductible, skilled nursing facility care, and
 medically necessary emergency care in a foreign country, as defined in paragraphs (2), (3), and (6) of subdivision (c) of Section 10192.81, respectively.

(11) Standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan N shall include only the following: the basic (core) benefit as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 10192.81, plus 100 percent of the Medicare Part A deductible, skilled nursing facility care, and medically necessary emergency care in a foreign country, as defined in paragraphs (1), (3), and (6) of subdivision (c) of Section 10192.81, respectively, with copayments in the following amounts:

(A) The lesser of twenty dollars ($20) or the Medicare Part B coinsurance or copayment for each covered health care provider office visit, including visits to medical
 specialists.

(B) The lesser of fifty dollars ($50) or the Medicare Part B coinsurance or copayment for each covered emergency room visit; however, this copayment shall be waived if the insured is admitted to any hospital and the emergency visit is subsequently covered as a Medicare Part A expense.

(f) (1) (A) An issuer may, with the prior approval of the commissioner, offer policies or certificates with new or innovative benefits, in addition to the standardized benefits provided in a policy or certificate that otherwise complies with the applicable standards. The new or innovative benefits shall include only benefits that are appropriate to Medicare supplement insurance, are new or innovative, are not otherwise available, and are cost effective.
 Approval of new or innovative benefits shall not adversely impact the goal of Medicare supplement simplification.

(B) New or innovative benefits shall exclude an outpatient prescription drug benefit. New or innovative benefits shall not be used to change or reduce benefits, including a change of any cost-sharing provision, in any standardized plan.

(C) Commencing July 1, 2020, the portion of the premium attributed to the new or innovative benefits shall be identified as a separate line item on the payment invoice or bill.

(2) In the interest of full and fair disclosure, and to ensure the availability of necessary consumer information to current and prospective policyholders and certificate holders, for purposes of implementing this paragraph, the department shall collaborate with the Department of Managed Health Care, consumer group representatives, and issuers to develop and implement policies and procedures, as necessary, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The development and dissemination of information and material about any new or innovative benefits approved for sale.

(B) The revision of materials described in Sections 10192.15 and 10192.18 of this code, and Sections 1358.15 and 1358.18 of the Health and Safety Code, as may be necessary.

(C) The standardization of new or innovative benefits, as appropriate, for purposes of allowing consumer comparison of benefits, out-of-pocket costs, and premiums.

(3) On or before July 1, 2020, the commissioner may issue guidance to issuers regarding compliance with this section and that guidance shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). Any guidance issued pursuant to this subdivision
 shall be effective only through December 31, 2022, or until the commissioner adopts and effects regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, whichever occurs first.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 157, Sec. 4) by Stats. 2019, Ch. 549, Sec. 3.   (SB 407)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.92.

The following standards are applicable to all Medicare supplement policies or certificates delivered or issued for delivery in this state to individuals newly eligible for Medicare on or after January 1, 2020. A policy or certificate that provides coverage of the Medicare Part B deductible shall not be advertised, solicited, delivered, or issued for delivery in the state as a Medicare supplement policy or certificate to individuals newly eligible for Medicare on or after January 1, 2020. All policies must comply with the following benefit standards. Benefit plan standards applicable to Medicare supplement policies and certificates issued to individuals eligible for Medicare before January 1, 2020, remain subject to the requirements of Section 10192.91 or 10192.9, as applicable.

(a) The standards and requirements of Section 10192.91 apply to all Medicare supplement policies delivered or issued for delivery to individuals newly eligible for Medicare on or after January 1, 2020, with the following exceptions:

(1) Standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan C is redesignated as plan D and shall provide the benefits described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 10192.91 but shall not provide coverage for 100 percent, or any portion, of the Medicare Part B deductible.

(2) Standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan F is redesignated as plan G and shall provide the benefits described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (e) of Section 10192.91, but shall not provide coverage for 100 percent, or any portion, of the Medicare Part B deductible.

(3) Standardized Medicare
 supplement benefit plans C, F, and high deductible plan F may not be offered to individuals newly eligible for Medicare on or after January 1, 2020.

(4) Standardized Medicare supplement benefit high deductible plan F is redesignated as high deductible plan G and shall provide the benefits described for standardized Medicare supplement benefit high deductible plan F in paragraph (6) of subdivision (e) of Section 10192.91, but shall not provide coverage for 100 percent, or any portion, of the Medicare Part B deductible. The Medicare Part B deductible paid by the beneficiary shall be considered an out-of-pocket expense in meeting the annual deductible under high deductible plan G.

(5) The reference to standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan C or F in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 10192.91 shall, for purposes of this section, be deemed a reference to standardized
 Medicare supplement benefit plan D or G, respectively.

(b) This section applies only to individuals who are newly eligible for Medicare on or after January 1, 2020. For purposes of this section, “newly eligible Medicare beneficiary” means an individual who satisfies one of the following:

(1) The individual has attained 65 years of age on or after January 1, 2020.

(2) The individual is entitled to benefits under Medicare Part A pursuant to Section 226(b) or 226A of the federal Social Security Act, or is deemed eligible for benefits under Section 226(a) of the federal Social Security Act, on or after January 1, 2020.

(c) For purposes of subdivision (e) of Section 10192.12, in the case of an individual newly eligible for Medicare on or after January 1,
 2020, any reference to standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan C, plan F, or high deductible plan F shall be deemed to be a reference to standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan D, plan G, or high deductible plan G, respectively, that meet the requirements of subdivision (a).

(d) On or after January 1, 2020, the standardized Medicare supplement benefit plans described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) may be offered to any individual who was eligible for Medicare prior to January 1, 2020, in addition to the standardized Medicare supplement benefit plans described in subdivision (e) of Section 10192.91.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 220.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.10.

(a) (1) This section shall apply to Medicare Select policies and certificates, as defined in this section.

(2) A policy or certificate shall not be advertised as a Medicare Select policy or certificate unless it meets the requirements of this section.

(b) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Appeal” means dissatisfaction
 expressed in writing by an individual insured under a Medicare Select policy or certificate with the administration, claims practices, or provision of services concerning a Medicare Select issuer or its network providers.

(2) “Complaint” means any dissatisfaction expressed by an individual concerning a Medicare Select issuer or its network providers.

(3) “Medicare Select issuer” means an issuer offering, seeking to offer, advertising, marketing, soliciting, or issuing a Medicare Select policy or certificate.

(4) “Medicare Select policy” or “Medicare Select certificate” means respectively a Medicare supplement policy or certificate that contains restricted network provisions.

(5) “Network provider” means a provider of health care, or a group of providers
 of health care, which has entered into a written agreement with the issuer or other entity to provide benefits insured under a Medicare Select policy.

(6) “Restricted network provision” means any provision that conditions the payment of benefits, in whole or in part, on the use of network providers.

(7) “Service area” means the geographic area approved by the commissioner within which an issuer is authorized to offer a Medicare Select policy.

(8) “Grievance” means a written complaint registered by an individual for resolution under the formal grievance procedure, which may involve, but is not limited to, the administration, claims practices, or provision of services by the issuer or its network providers.

(9) “Medicare Select coverage” means Medicare
 supplement coverage through a preferred provider organization or any other type of restricted network, which coverage has been approved by the commissioner under this section.

(10) “Preferred provider organization” means a health care provider or an entity contracting with health care providers that (A) establishes alternative or discounted rates of payment, (B) offers the insureds certain advantages for selecting the member providers, or (C) withholds from the insureds certain advantages if they choose providers other than the member providers. Organizations regulated as Medicare Select include, but are not limited to, provider groups, hospital marketing plans, and organizations that are formed or operated by insurers or third-party administrators.

(c) The commissioner may authorize an issuer to offer a Medicare Select policy or certificate pursuant to this section if the
 commissioner finds that the issuer has satisfied all of the requirements of this section.

(d) A Medicare Select issuer shall not issue a Medicare Select policy or certificate in this state until its plan of operation has been approved by the commissioner.

(e) A Medicare Select issuer shall file a proposed plan of operation with the commissioner in a format prescribed by the commissioner. The plan of operation shall contain at least the following information:

(1) Evidence that all covered services that are subject to restricted network provisions are available and accessible through network providers, including a demonstration of all of the following:

(A) That services can be provided by network providers with reasonable promptness with respect to
 geographic location, hours of operation, and afterhour care. The hours of operation and availability of afterhour care shall reflect usual practice in the local area. Geographic availability shall reflect the usual travel times within the community.

(B) That the number of network providers in the service area is sufficient, with respect to current and expected policyholders, as to either of the following:

(i) To deliver adequately all services that are subject to a restricted network provision.

(ii) To make appropriate referrals.

(C) There are written agreements with network providers describing specific responsibilities.

(D) Emergency care is available 24 hours per day and seven days per
 week.

(E) In the case of covered services that are subject to a restricted network provision and are provided on a prepaid basis, that there are written agreements with network providers prohibiting the providers from billing or otherwise seeking reimbursement from or recourse against any individual insured under a Medicare Select policy or certificate.

This subparagraph shall not apply to supplemental charges or coinsurance amounts as stated in the Medicare Select policy or certificate.

(2) A statement or map providing a clear description of the service area.

(3) A description of the appeal or grievance procedure to be utilized.

(4) A description of the quality assurance program, including all of the
 following:

(A) The formal organizational structure.

(B) The written criteria for selection, retention, and removal of network providers.

(C) The procedures for evaluating quality of care provided by network providers, and the process to initiate corrective action when warranted.

(5) A list and description, by specialty, of the network providers.

(6) Copies of the written information proposed to be used by the issuer to comply with subdivision (i).

(7) Any other information requested by the commissioner.

(f) (1) A Medicare Select issuer
 shall file any proposed changes to the plan of operation, except for changes to the list of network providers, with the commissioner prior to implementing the changes. Changes shall be considered approved by the commissioner after 30 days unless specifically disapproved.

(2) An updated list of network providers shall be filed at the commissioner’s request, but at least quarterly.

(g) A Medicare Select policy or certificate shall not restrict payment for covered services provided by nonnetwork providers if:

(1) The services are for symptoms requiring emergency care or are immediately required for an unforeseen illness, injury, or condition.

(2) It is not reasonable to obtain services through a network provider.

(h) A Medicare Select policy or certificate shall provide payment for full coverage under the policy for covered services that are not available through network providers.

(i) A Medicare Select issuer shall make full and fair disclosure in writing of the provisions, restrictions, and limitations of the Medicare Select policy or certificate to each applicant. This disclosure shall include at least the following:

(1) An outline of coverage sufficient to permit the applicant to compare the coverage and premiums of the Medicare Select policy or certificate with both of the following:

(A) Other Medicare supplement policies or certificates offered by the issuer.

(B) Other Medicare Select policies or
 certificates.

(2) A description, including address, telephone number, and hours of operation, of the network providers, including primary care physicians, specialty physicians, hospitals, and other providers.

(3) A description of the restricted network provisions, including payments for coinsurance and deductibles when providers other than network providers are utilized. The description shall inform the applicant that expenses incurred when using out-of-network providers are excluded from the out-of-pocket annual limit in benefit plans K and L, unless the policy or certificate provides otherwise.

(4) A description of coverage for emergency and urgently needed care and other out-of-service area coverage.

(5) A description of limitations on referrals to
 restricted network providers and to other providers.

(6) A description of the policyholder’s or certificate holder’s rights to purchase any other Medicare supplement policy or certificate otherwise offered by the issuer.

(7) A description of the Medicare Select issuer’s quality assurance, grievance, and appeal procedure.

(j) Prior to the sale of a Medicare Select policy or certificate, a Medicare Select issuer shall obtain from the applicant a signed and dated form stating that the applicant has received the information provided pursuant to subdivision (i) and that the applicant understands the restrictions of the Medicare Select policy or certificate. Acknowledgments shall be maintained by the insurer for at least five years in accordance with Section 10508.

(k) A Medicare Select issuer shall have and use procedures for hearing complaints and resolving written appeals and grievances from the insureds. The procedures shall be aimed at mutual agreement for settlement and may include arbitration procedures.

(1) The appeal and grievance procedure shall be described in the policy and certificates and in the outline of coverage.

(2) At the time the policy or certificate is issued, the issuer shall provide detailed information to the policyholder or certificate holder describing how an appeal or grievance may be registered with the issuer.

(3) Appeals or grievances shall be considered in a timely manner and shall be transmitted to appropriate fiduciaries who have authority to fully investigate the issue and take corrective action.

(4) If an appeal or grievance is found to be valid, corrective action shall be taken promptly.

(5) All concerned parties shall be notified about the results of an appeal or grievance.

(6) The issuer shall report no later than each March 31st to the commissioner regarding its appeal or grievance procedure. The report shall be in a format prescribed by the commissioner and shall contain the number of appeals or grievances filed in the past year and a summary of the subject, nature, and resolution of those appeals or grievances.

(7) Detailed information describing in writing how to register an appeal or grievance shall be provided to the insured prior to, or simultaneously with, the issuance of the policy or certificate.

(8) The issuer shall maintain records of each appeal or grievance for at least five years.

(l) At the time of initial purchase, a Medicare Select issuer shall make available to each applicant for a Medicare Select policy or certificate the opportunity to purchase any Medicare supplement policy or certificate otherwise offered by the issuer.

(m) (1) At the request of an individual insured under a Medicare Select policy or certificate, a Medicare Select issuer shall make available to the individual insured the opportunity to purchase a Medicare supplement policy or certificate offered by the issuer that has comparable or lesser benefits and that does not contain a restricted network provision. The issuer shall make the policies or certificates available without requiring evidence of
 insurability after the Medicare Select policy or certificate has been in force for six months, unless the replacement policy or certificate includes at-home recovery benefits that were not included in the Medicare Select coverage.

(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, a Medicare supplement policy or certificate will be considered to have comparable or lesser benefits unless it contains one or more significant benefits not included in the Medicare Select policy or certificate being replaced. For the purposes of this paragraph, a significant benefit means coverage for the Medicare Part A deductible, coverage for at-home recovery services, or coverage for Medicare Part B excess charges.

(n) Medicare Select policies and certificates shall provide for continuation of coverage in the event the commissioner determines that Medicare Select policies and certificates issued pursuant to
 this section should be discontinued due to either the failure of the Medicare Select program to be reauthorized under law or its substantial amendment.

(1) Each Medicare Select issuer shall make available to each individual insured under a Medicare Select policy or certificate the opportunity to purchase any Medicare supplement policy or certificate offered by the issuer that has comparable or lesser benefits and that does not contain a restricted network provision. The issuer shall make the policies and certificates available without requiring evidence of insurability.

(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, a Medicare supplement policy or certificate will be considered to have comparable or lesser benefits unless it contains one or more significant benefits not included in the Medicare Select policy or certificate being replaced. For the purposes of this paragraph, a
 significant benefit means coverage for the Medicare Part A deductible, coverage for at-home recovery services, or coverage for Medicare Part B excess charges.

(o) A Medicare Select issuer shall comply with reasonable requests for data made by state or federal agencies, including the United States Department of Health and Human Services for the purpose of evaluating the Medicare Select program.

(p) The commissioner may grant special Medicare Select status to plans of guaranteed renewable Medicare supplement coverage provided through a preferred provider organization, which plans were offered to the public or in force before the effective date of this section, if the commissioner determines that the applicants will receive benefits and consumer protections that are substantially equivalent to those in other Medicare Select plans identified in this section, and if the issuer
 satisfies the following requirements:

(1) The issuer shall apply within one year of the effective date of this section by submitting to the commissioner the following items:

(A) The current plan of operation as defined in subdivision (e).

(B) If the written disclosures of subdivision (i) have not been delivered to each applicant as required, the issuer’s plan to accomplish full disclosure to every insured and to achieve substantial compliance with subdivision (j).

(C) The issuer’s statement of intent to comply with subdivision (f).

(D) If the plan of operation does not comply with the standards of subdivision (g), (h), (k), (l), or (m), the issuer’s plan for achieving substantial
 compliance with these subdivisions for every insured.

(2) The issuer shall alter the plan as requested by the commissioner in order to bring the plan into substantial compliance with Medicare Select standards.

(3) The issuer shall issue disclosures or other notices to its insureds regarding its status as Medicare Select as ordered by the commissioner.

(4) The issuer shall provide data as provided in subdivision (o).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 206, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.11.

(a) (1) An issuer shall not deny or condition the issuance or effectiveness of any Medicare supplement policy or certificate available for sale in this state, nor discriminate in the pricing of a policy or certificate because of the health status, claims experience, receipt of health care, or medical condition of an applicant in the case of an application for a policy or certificate that is submitted prior to or during the six-month period beginning with the first day of the first month in which an individual is both 65 years of age or older and is enrolled for benefits under Medicare Part B. Each Medicare supplement policy and certificate currently available from an issuer shall be made available to all applicants who
 qualify under this subdivision and who are 65 years of age or older.

(2) (A) An issuer shall make available Medicare supplement benefit plans A, B, C, and F, if currently available, to an applicant who qualifies under this subdivision, who is 64 years of age or younger, and who does not have end-stage renal disease. An issuer shall also make available to those applicants Medicare supplement benefit plan K or L, if currently available, or Medicare supplement benefit plan M or N, if currently available. The selection between Medicare supplement plan K or L and the selection between Medicare supplement benefit plan M or N shall be made at the issuer’s discretion.

(B) For policies sold on or after January 1, 2020, to newly eligible Medicare beneficiaries, as
 defined in subdivision (b) of Section 10192.92, an issuer shall make available Medicare supplement benefit plans A, B, D, and G, if currently available, to applicants who qualify under this subdivision who are 64 years of age or younger and who do not have end-stage renal disease. An issuer shall also make available to those applicants Medicare supplement benefit plan K or L, if currently available, or Medicare supplement benefit plan M or N, if currently available. The selection between Medicare supplement benefit plan K or L and the selection between Medicare supplement benefit plan M or N shall be made at the issuer’s discretion.

(3) This section and Section 10192.12 do not prohibit an issuer in determining premium rates from treating applicants who are under 65 years of age and are eligible for Medicare Part B as a separate risk
 classification. This section
 does not prevent the exclusion of benefits for preexisting conditions as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 10192.8 or paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 10192.81.

(b) (1) If an applicant qualifies under subdivision (a) and submits an application during the time period referenced in subdivision (a) and, as of the date of application, has had a continuous period of creditable coverage of at least six months, the issuer shall not exclude benefits based on a preexisting condition.

(2) If the applicant qualifies under subdivision (a) and submits an application during the time period referenced in subdivision (a) and, as of the date of application, has had a continuous period of creditable coverage that is less than
 six months, the issuer shall reduce the period of any preexisting condition exclusion by the aggregate of the period of creditable coverage applicable to the applicant as of the enrollment date. The manner of the reduction under this subdivision shall be as specified by the commissioner.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (b) and Section 10192.23, subdivision (a) does not prevent the exclusion of benefits under a policy, during the first six months, based on a preexisting condition for which the policyholder or certificate holder received treatment or was otherwise diagnosed during the six months before the coverage became effective.

(d) An individual enrolled in Medicare by reason of disability shall be entitled to open enrollment described in this section for six
 months after the date of their enrollment in Medicare Part B, or if notified retroactively of their eligibility for Medicare, for six months following notice of eligibility. Every issuer shall make available to every applicant qualified for open enrollment all policies and certificates offered by that issuer at the time of application. An issuer shall not discourage sales during the open enrollment period by any means, including the altering of the commission structure.

(e) (1) An individual enrolled in Medicare Part B is entitled to open enrollment described in this section for six months following:

(A) Receipt of a notice of termination or, if no notice is received, the effective date of termination from any employer-sponsored health plan including an
 employer-sponsored retiree health plan.

(B) Receipt of a notice of loss of eligibility due to the divorce or death of a spouse or, if no notice is received, the effective date of loss of eligibility due to the divorce or death of a spouse, from any employer-sponsored health plan including an employer-sponsored retiree health plan.

(C) Termination of health care services for a military retiree or the retiree’s Medicare eligible spouse or dependent as a result of a military base closure or loss of access to health care services because the base no longer offers services or because the individual relocates.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “employer-sponsored retiree health plan” includes any coverage for medical
 expenses, including, but not limited to, coverage under the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985 (COBRA) and the California Continuation Benefits Replacement Act (Cal-COBRA), that is directly or indirectly sponsored or established by an employer for employees or retirees, their spouses, dependents, or other included insureds.

(f) An individual enrolled in Medicare Part B is entitled to open enrollment described in this section if the individual was covered under a policy, certificate, or contract providing Medicare supplement coverage but that coverage terminated because the individual established residence at a location not served by the plan.

(g) An individual whose coverage was terminated by a Medicare Advantage plan shall be entitled to an
 additional 60-day open enrollment period to be added on to and run consecutively after any open enrollment period authorized by federal law or regulation, for any Medicare supplement coverage provided by a Medicare supplement issuer and available on a guaranteed basis under state and federal law or regulation for persons terminated by their Medicare Advantage plan.

(h) (1) An individual shall be entitled to an annual open enrollment period lasting 60 days or more, commencing with the individual’s birthday, during which time that person may purchase any Medicare supplement policy that offers benefits equal to or lesser than those provided by the previous coverage. During this open enrollment period, an issuer that falls under this paragraph shall not deny or condition the issuance or effectiveness of Medicare
 supplement coverage, nor discriminate in the pricing of coverage, because of health status, claims experience, receipt of health care, or medical condition of the individual if, at the time of the open enrollment period, the individual is covered under another Medicare supplement policy or contract. An issuer shall notify a policyholder of their rights under this subdivision at least 30 and no more than 60 days before the beginning of the open enrollment period, and on any notice related to a benefit modification or premium adjustment.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the following provisions apply:

(A) A 1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan A shall be deemed to offer benefits equal to those provided by a 2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan
 A.
